Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-210
Gross receipts, defined.

Gross receipts shall mean the total receipts received from admissions to the premises where bingo is conducted, when such admissions are directly related to the participation in bingo, and from the sale, rental, or use of all bingo cards.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 9;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-132;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 14.